Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 104 of Title 66, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "FRA-certified conductor" means a conductor, switchman,
brakeman, trainman, or fireman licensed and certified by the Federal
Railroad Administration (FRA);
2. "FRA-certified engineer" means an engineer licensed and
certified by the FRA;
3. "Railroad accident or incident" means accidents involving
persons, including pedestrians, motor vehicles, and animals,
Req. No. 11055 Page 1

inci dental to and as a consequence of the flow of vehicles and
pedestrians along the railroads of Oklahoma; and
4. "Railroad management" means any rail employee overseeing and
assisting in the operation of rail transit.
B. For identification purposes, no railroad employee involved
in a railroad accident or incident shall be required to show his or
her driver license to law enforcement or other safety officer.
Railroad employees shall be allowed to show the following
identification:
1. An FRA-certified conductor shall provide his or her FRA
certification;
2. An FRA-certified engineer shall provide his or her FRA
certification; and
3. Railroad management shall provide his or her FRA
certification.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11055 JBH 01/03/25



Req. No. 11055 Page 2